Hawaii statutes.
§304A-2007 Special and revolving funds;
annual report; expenditures in excess of appropriations. (a) The
university shall annually provide to the legislature, at least twenty days
prior to the convening of the regular session, an itemized account of the
income to and the expenditure from each university special and revolving fund
during the previous fiscal year.

(b) The report shall also include all
expenditures in excess of each fund's appropriation for each fiscal year.

(c) The itemized account of income and
expenditures required under this section shall be in addition to any other item
for reporting that the legislature may specifically require under the law
establishing the special or revolving fund. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2011,
c 92, §§1, 3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next